District of Columbia statutes.
32-1363

Retaliation unlawful.

No employer or employment agency shall:

(1)

Interfere with, restrain, or deny the exercise of, or the attempted exercise of, any right provided under this chapter; or

(2)

Fail or refuse to hire, or discharge, any employee or potential employee because the employee or potential employee:

(A)

Opposed any practice made unlawful by this chapter;

(B)

Has filed any charge, or has instituted or caused to be instituted any proceeding, relating to any right provided under this chapter;

(C)

Has given, or is about to give, any information in connection with any inquiry or proceeding relating to any right provided under this chapter; or

(D)

Has testified, or is about to testify, in any inquiry or proceeding relating to any right provided under this chapter.

May 31, 2012, D.C. Law 19-132, § 4, 59 DCR 2391